District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0653.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Strengthening Our Home Care Workforce Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 3 of the Minimum Wage Act Revision Act of 1992, approved March 25,
1993 (D.C. Law 9-248; D.C. Official Code § 32-1002), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (1A) is redesignated as paragraph (1B).
(b) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
“(1A) The term “domestic worker” shall have the same meaning as in section
101(4) of the Domestic Worker Employment Rights Amendment Act of 2022, approved March
10, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-305; D.C. Code § 32-1071.01(4)).”.


(c) Paragraph (2) is amended to strike the phrase “an employee” and insert the phrase “an
employee, including domestic workers and home care workers,” in its place.
(d) Paragraph (4A) is redesignated as paragraph (4B).
(e) A new paragraph (4A) is added to read as follows:
“(4A) The term “home care worker” means an employed individual who provides
direct personal care services, supervision, health-related services, or companionship to
individuals with disabilities, chronic illnesses, or age-related limitations in a private home or
residential setting.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).